Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB766.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. PFC Earl "Butch" Long Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Earl Wayne Long was born in Ruffs Dale on March 8, 1947.(2) Private First Class Long enlisted in the United States Army during the Vietnam War.(3) Private First Class Long served as an 11B-infantryman in B troop, 1st Squadron, 11th Armored Cavalry Regiment.(4) On August 15, 1967, Private First Class Long was a passenger in an armored personnel carrier on a combat operation when the vehicle hit a hostile mine.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Private First Class Long was killed on August 15, 1967, in Phuoc Long, South Vietnam, at 20 years of age by a hostile explosive device.(6) Private First Class Long was laid to rest at Westmoreland County Memorial Park in Greensburg.(7) For his meritorious service, Private First Class Long was awarded the Bronze Star, the Purple Heart Medal, the National Defense Service Medal, the Vietnam Service Medal and the Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal.(b) Designation.--The portion of State Route 3037 from the intersection with Waltz Mill Flats Road to Segment 0170/Offset 0950 in Sewickley Township, Westmoreland County, is designated as the PFC Earl "Butch" Long Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0766PN0790 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718